Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.105

Amendment and termination of plan of conversion.

The plan of conversion adopted by the applicant's board of directors may be amended by the board of directors with the concurrence of the director at any time prior to final approval of the director and may be terminated with the concurrence of the director at any time prior to issuance of the authorization certificate by the director.

[ 1994 c 92 s 358; 1981 c 85 s 20.]